Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF867.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2127HV (1) 91 je/jh H.F. 867 Section 1. Section 84A.1B, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 18. Create, in collaboration with the Iowa 3 association of independent colleges and universities, a list 4 of high-wage and high-demand jobs and corresponding academic 5 majors offered by accredited private institutions as defined in 6 section 256.183 for purposes of the Iowa tuition grant program 7 established under chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 4, subpart 8 B. The workforce development board, in collaboration with the 9 Iowa association of independent colleges and universities, 10 shall update the list at least once every two years. In 11 creating a list under this subsection, the following criteria, 12 at a minimum, apply: 13 a. An entry-level annual salary of not less than forty 14 thousand dollars. 15 b. Educational attainment of a qualifying credential of 16 at least a bachelorâs degree, or attainment of an initial or 17 intern Iowa teaching license issued under chapter 256 through 18 a pathway to licensure offered by an accredited private 19 institution as defined in section 256.183. 20 c. At least one of any of the following: 21 (1) Projected annual job openings of at least two hundred 22 fifty during the next five years. 23 (2) Projected annual growth in the number of job openings 24 of at least one percent. 25 Sec. 2. Section 256.189, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 26 by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. Award no less than fifty percent of the 28 funds available for the tuition grant program each fiscal year 29 to students pursuing majors that correspond to high-wage and 30 high-demand jobs included in the list of such jobs created by 31 the workforce development board pursuant to section 84A.1B, 32 subsection 18. 33 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 34 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment: 35 -1- LSB 2127HV (1) 91 je/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 867 The section of this Act enacting section 84A.1B, subsection 1 18. 2